New York, session 2025-2026, A2627.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a 2 new section 15-0519 to read as follows: 3 § 15-0519. Water quality improvement; lake associations. 4 1. Subject to an appropriation for such purpose, the department shall, 5 in consultation with the environmental facilities corporation, create a 6 program to assist municipalities to improve the water quality in water 7 bodies managed by lake associations located within such municipality. 8 The program shall, in cooperation with municipalities at the request of 9 the lake association: 10 a. identify any water quality concerns at a water body managed by a 11 lake association within the municipality; 12 b. determine the most effective way to remediate any water quality 13 concerns; and 14 c. assist with determining best practices to improve and maintain 15 water quality of water bodies managed by lake associations within the 16 municipality. 17 2. The department shall establish a grant program to assist munici- 18 palities with remedial actions to address the water quality of water 19 bodies within the municipality managed by lake associations. 20 3. The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to 21 implement this section. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 23 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 24 ment, and/or repeal of any rules and regulations necessary to implement 25 the provisions of this act on its effective date are authorized to be 26 made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05488-01-5